incubator/apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="f/o__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oym</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oyd</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oee</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oin</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eue</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oue</l>
          <r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ug__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ug</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ood</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uggey</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uic</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ooin</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uc</l>
          <r>ug<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/eh__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eh</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eem</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eed</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eh</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eu</l>
          <r>eh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/esh__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hiam</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hiat</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hee</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hinn</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hiu</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hieu</l>
          <r>esh<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li/orish__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orish</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orym</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ort</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orish</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oree</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orin</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eriu</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oroo</l>
          <r>orish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/arish__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arish</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arym</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ayrt</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arish</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aree</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arin</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eriu</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aroo</l>
          <r>arish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fo"><i>f</i><par n="f/o__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hug"><i>h</i><par n="h/ug__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="jeh"><i>j</i><par n="j/eh__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lesh"><i>l</i><par n="l/esh__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="liorish"><i>li</i><par n="li/orish__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="marish"><i>m</i><par n="m/arish__pr"/></e>
